California statutes. Elections Code
(2) The results of votes cast form provided to the county elections official shows the same numbers.⁭(B) RESULTS OF VOTES CAST ARE NOT POSTED FOR VOTING MACHINES THAT RECORDED FEWER THAN 10 BALLOTS. RESULTS OF VOTES CAST ON ALL OTHER VOTING MACHINES ARE POSTED.(1) The results of the votes cast form posted outside the polling place includes the total number of votes cast on each voting machine for each candidate for each office, and the total number of votes cast on each voting machine for and against each ballot measure, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) For
 each voting machine recording fewer than 10 ballots, only the number of ballots cast on that machine is posted.

(3) The results of votes cast form provided to the county elections official shows the same numbers.(C) RESULTS OF VOTES CAST ARE NOT POSTED FOR ANY VOTING MACHINES BECAUSE FEWER THAN 10 BALLOTS WERE CAST IN THE PRECINCT.In this case, only the number of ballots cast on each voting machine is posted and included on the results of votes cast form provided to the county elections official.InspectorAssistant InspectorJudgeJudge ClerkClerkClerkClerk ⁭(D) RESULTS ARE A SUMMARY OF ALL PRECINCTS VOTING AT THE POLLING PLACE OR VOTER CENTER.In this case, only the summary of votes for all precincts combined is reported. An additional report showing just the number of people who voted in each precinct may also be provided, but it will not show by precinct the votes cast for each candidate in each office.

(c) (1) The precinct board shall sign and post conspicuously on the outside of the polling place a copy of the results of votes cast form. The copy shall remain posted for at least 48 hours after the
 official time fixed for the closing of the polls.

(2) To protect a person’s right to cast a secret ballot under Section 7 of Article II of the California Constitution, in cases where
 fewer than 10 voters cast ballots on any single voting machine on which the results are tallied at the precinct, the precinct board shall post only the total number of people who voted on that voting machine, and shall not post the total number of votes cast on each voting machine for each candidate for each office or the total number of votes cast on each voting machine for and against each ballot measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 74.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15251.

Upon receipt of the result of votes cast from the precinct boards, the elections official shall do either of the following:

(a) Compile and make available to the public the received results as to the offices and measures.

(b) Compare the received results to the results provided to the public from the central tabulation or tally system pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15300) of Division 15.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 75.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishing Election Return Centers and Multiple Counting Centers [15260. - 15261.]

15260.

(a) The elections official of the jurisdiction shall establish one or more election return centers for the purpose of facilitating the compilation of election returns and expediting their announcement to the public.

(b) In establishing a return center, the elections official may designate a group of precincts which the center shall serve and this designation shall be available for public inspection no later than 15 days before the election. The election return center may be at any public place as the elections official designates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15261.

The elections official may establish one or more centers to count ballots from designated precincts and transmit the results via voice telephone connection or facsimile transmission. The count shall be conducted in all other respects in accordance with the central counting provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 15200). The list of designated precincts for each counting center shall be available for public inspection no later than 15 days before the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Manual Vote Count in the Precinct [15270. - 15281.]

15270.

This article applies to all elections in which ballots are counted by hand.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15270.1.

(a) An elections official shall not conduct a manual vote count pursuant to this article or Article 6 (commencing with Section 15290) in any election unless that manual count is conducted pursuant to a plan approved by the Secretary of State. A manual count plan shall be consistent with the regulations adopted by the Secretary of State regarding
 manual vote counts. The Secretary of State shall prepare a template of a manual count plan that an elections official may use to assist in meeting this requirement.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an elections official shall not conduct a manual vote count in an election, and the Secretary of State shall not approve a plan to conduct a manual vote count for that election, if either of the following are true:

(1) The election is held on an established election date, as provided in Section 1000, and there are more than 1,000 registered voters who are eligible to participate in that
 election as of 154 days in advance of the election.

(2) The election is held on a date other than an established election date, and there are more than 5,000 registered voters who are eligible to participate in that election as of 154 days in advance of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   (AB 969)   Effective October 4, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15270.2.

The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations regarding manual vote counts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 300, Sec. 2.   (AB 969)   Effective October 4, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15270.3.

Notwithstanding Section 15270.1 or subdivision (a) of Section 19207.5, an elections official may conduct a manual vote count in the event of a natural disaster or other state of emergency in which use of a certified voting system is not feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   (AB 969)   Effective October 4, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15271.

As soon as the polls are finally closed, the precinct board shall commence to count the votes by taking the ballots cast, unopened, out of the box and counting them to ascertain whether the number of ballots corresponds with the number of signatures on the roster. The precinct board shall make a record upon the roster of the number of ballots in the ballot box, the number of signatures on the roster, and the difference, if any.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15272.

The count shall be public and shall be continued without adjournment until completed and the result is declared. During the reading and tallying, the ballot read and the tally sheet kept shall be within the clear view of watchers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15273.

Unless otherwise provided in this code, the precinct board members may not constitute themselves into separate squads in an attempt to conduct more than one count of the ballots at the same time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15274.

The members of the precinct board may relieve each other in the duties of counting ballots.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15275.

Those ballots not rejected shall be placed in one pile, and the board shall proceed to count by tallying the vote for one or more offices or measures at a time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15276.

The precinct board members shall ascertain the number of votes cast for each person and for and against each measure in the following manner:

One precinct board member shall read from the ballots. As the ballots are read, at least one other precinct board member shall keep watch of each vote so as to check on any possible error or omission on the part of the officer reading or calling the ballot.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15277.

(a) Two of the precinct board members shall each keep a tally sheet in a form prescribed by the elections official. Each tally sheet shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name of each candidate being voted for and the specific office for which each candidate is being voted. The offices shall be in the same order as on the ballot.

(2) A list of each measure being voted upon.

(3) Sufficient space to permit the tallying of the full vote cast for each candidate and for and against each measure.

(b) The precinct board members keeping the tally sheets shall record opposite each name or measure, with pen or indelible pencil, the number of votes by tallies as the name of each candidate or measure voted upon is read aloud from the respective ballot.

(c) Immediately upon the completion of the tallies, the precinct board members keeping the tally shall draw two heavy lines in ink or indelible pencil from the last tally mark to the end of the line in which the tallies terminate and initial that line. The total number of votes counted for each candidate and for and against each measure shall be recorded on the tally sheets in words and figures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15278.

On completion of the canvass of the returns for each election, the elections official shall compare the vote by mail voters’ list with the roster for each precinct to determine if any voter cast more than one ballot at that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 76.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15278.5.

No precinct board member may make any tally of votes in any other manner than is provided in this article, nor in any place other than on the tally sheets provided for that purpose.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 15278 (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 344, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15279.

The ballots, as soon as all of the names and measures marked on them as voted for are read and tallied, shall not thereafter be examined by any person, but, as soon as all are counted, shall be carefully sealed in a strong envelope. The signatures of each member of the precinct board shall be written across the seal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15280.

The precinct board shall complete, sign, and return to the elections official all furnished forms requiring its signatures.

When votes are counted at the precinct, all members of the precinct board, upon the completion of their duties, shall sign the following certificate of performance, which shall be substantially in the following form:

Certificate of Performance

for ____ precinct, for the ____ election, held on the ____
 day of ____, (year).

We hereby certify that the total number of votes received by each candidate for each office and the total number of votes cast for and against each measure is as indicated on the tally sheets.

We further certify that the results of votes cast forms posted outside the polling place and transmitted to the county elections official show the total number of votes received by each candidate for each office and the total number of votes cast for and against each measure is as indicated.InspectorAssistant InspectorJudgeJudgeClerkClerkClerkClerk

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15281.

The precinct board shall sign and post conspicuously on the outside of the polling place a copy of the result of the votes cast. The copy shall remain posted for at least 48 hours after the official time fixed for the closing of the polls. To protect a person’s right to cast a secret ballot under Section 7 of Article II of the California Constitution, in cases where fewer than 10 voters cast ballots and the precinct board tallies
 the results at the precinct, the precinct board shall post only the total number of people who voted at the precinct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 402, Sec. 3.   (AB 2797)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Manual Vote Count in a Central Place [15290. - 15290.]

15290.

Ballots that are to be counted manually in a central place shall be transported as provided in Sections 15201 and 15202. Each counting board shall proceed to count and tally the ballots by precincts, separately, under the direction of the elections official or authorized deputies, in the same manner as provided where ballots are counted at the polling place pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 15270).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Official Canvass [15300. - 15377.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15300. - 15307.]

15300.

This chapter applies to all elections.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15301.

(a) The canvass shall commence no later than the Thursday following the election, shall be open to the public, and, for state or statewide elections, shall result in a report of results to the Secretary of State.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the canvass shall be continued daily, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excepted, for not less than six hours each day until completed.

(2) If the only ballots that the elections official has left to count as part of the official canvass are vote by mail ballots for which a voter has been provided, or will be provided, the opportunity to verify or to
 provide their signature pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 3019, as applicable, and the elections official does not need to conduct the official canvass for at least six hours per day in order to meet the deadline for certification of results pursuant to this section and Section 15372, the official canvass may be conducted for fewer than six hours per day until completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 279, Sec. 4.   (AB 827)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15302.

The official canvass shall include, but not be limited to, the following tasks:

(a) An inspection of all materials and supplies returned by poll workers.

(b) A reconciliation of the number of signatures on the roster with the number of ballots recorded on the ballot statement.

(c) In the event of a discrepancy in the reconciliation required by subdivision (b), the number of ballots received from each polling place shall be reconciled with the number of ballots cast, as indicated on the ballot statement.

(d) A reconciliation of the number of ballots counted, spoiled, canceled, or invalidated due to identifying marks, overvotes, or as otherwise provided by statute, with the number of votes recorded, including vote by mail and provisional ballots, by the vote counting system.

(e) Processing and counting any valid vote by mail and provisional ballots not included in the semifinal official canvass.

(f) Counting any valid write-in votes.

(g) Reproducing any damaged ballots, if necessary.

(h) Reporting final results to the governing board and the Secretary of State, as required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15303.

If the returns from any precinct are incomplete, ambiguous, not properly authenticated, or otherwise defective, the elections official may issue and serve subpoenas requiring members of the precinct board to appear and be examined under oath concerning the manner in which votes were counted and the result of the count in their precinct. This section shall apply when ballots are tabulated manually or automatically at the polls.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15304.

In jurisdictions using a central counting place, the elections official may appoint not less than three deputies to open the envelopes or containers with the materials returned from the precincts. If, after examination, any of the materials are incomplete, ambiguous, not properly authenticated, or otherwise defective, the precinct officers may be summoned before the elections official and examined under oath to describe polling place procedures and to correct the errors or omissions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15305.

(a) For purposes of this section, “unprocessed ballot” means a voted polling place ballot, voted vote by mail ballot, voted provisional ballot, or voted conditional registration ballot that has not yet been counted or processed for counting.

(b) On the second day after the election, an elections official shall send to the Secretary of State an initial report containing the estimated number of
 outstanding unprocessed ballots. 

(c) Commencing on the sixth day after the election, an elections official shall,
 on any day that the elections official publicly releases updated election results, send to the Secretary of State a report on the estimated number of outstanding unprocessed ballots. The report shall be submitted to the Secretary of State in the form and manner prescribed by the Secretary of State, and the last report shall be delivered upon the completion of the official canvass.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.   (AB 566)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

15306.

(a) Beginning no later than the Thursday following an election, and until the time specified in subdivision (b), an elections official shall post updated information regarding the election on their internet website at least two times by the following Thursday and at least twice a week thereafter. The updates shall include at least the following information:

(1) Updated results for any candidate or measure appearing on the ballot.

(2) The number of ballots processed and an estimated number of outstanding ballots remaining unprocessed using the unprocessed ballot categories prescribed by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15305. This information shall be posted on either the homepage of an
 election official’s internet website or on the stand-alone webpage for the specific election on an elections official’s internet website. Posting a hyperlink to a separate file containing this information does not satisfy the requirements of this subdivision.

(3) The date and time when it is expected that the next results will be posted. This information shall be posted on the homepage of an elections official’s internet website, on the stand-alone webpage for the specific election on an elections official’s internet website, or on the stand-alone website that contains updated election results for the specific election pursuant to paragraph (1). Posting a hyperlink to a separate file containing this information does not satisfy the requirements of this subdivision.

(b) The elections official may stop posting the results described in subdivision (a) when either of the following
 occurs:

(1) A certified statement of results is published pursuant to Section 15372.

(2) The only ballots left to count are vote by mail ballots for which a voter has the opportunity either to verify their signature pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3019 or to provide their signature pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3019. If the elections official stops posting results for this reason, they shall post a notice stating this reason on their internet website.

(c) The requirements of this section are in addition to any other duty to report or publish information required of the elections official pursuant to this division or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 307, Sec. 4.   (SB 3)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15307.

(a) On or before the 13th day following the election, an elections official shall finish counting all ballots, except those described in subdivision (b), and shall release the vote count for those ballots.

(b) The requirement to finish counting all ballots and release the vote count for those ballots on or before the 13th day
 following the election does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A duplicate ballot prepared pursuant to Section 15210 or subdivision (c) of Section 3106.

(2) A vote by mail ballot that is forwarded to the county elections official who issued the ballot pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 3017.

(3) A vote by mail ballot for which a voter has the opportunity either to verify a signature pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3019 or to provide a signature pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3019.

(4) A provisional ballot.

(5) A ballot cast by a person who
 completes a conditional voter registration pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 2170) of Chapter 2 of Division 2.

(6) A ballot received by an elections official after the fourth day following the election.

(c) If an elections official will not meet the deadline set forth in subdivision (a), the elections official shall file a notice of extension with the Secretary of State and include the reason for the extension. Both the Secretary of State and the elections official shall post the extension filing on their respective websites.

(d) Nothing in this section alters the statutory obligations imposed by Sections 3019, 15320, 15321, and 15342 regarding
 counties completing their respective vote canvasses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   (AB 5)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Processing Vote by Mail Ballots and Mail Ballot Precinct Ballots [15320. - 15321.]

15320.

Vote by mail ballots and mail ballot precinct ballots returned to the elections office and to the polls on or before election day that are not included in the semifinal official canvass phase of the election, including any ballots returned to another jurisdiction in the state and forwarded to the elections official who issued the ballot pursuant to Section 3017, shall be processed and counted during the official canvass in the manner prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15100) of Division 15, and pursuant to the requirements of Section 3019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 77.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15321.

For any statewide election or special election to fill a vacancy in a congressional or legislative office, votes cast by vote by mail ballot and votes cast at the polling place shall be tabulated by precinct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Processing Write-In Votes [15340. - 15342.5.]

15340.

Except for a voter-nominated office at a general election, each voter is entitled to write on the ballot the name of any candidate for any public office, including that of President and Vice President of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 44.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15341.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no name written upon a ballot in any election shall be counted for an office or nomination unless the candidate whose name has been written on the ballot has complied with Part 3 (commencing with Section 8600) of Division 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15342.

Any name written upon a ballot for a qualified write-in candidate, including a reasonable facsimile of the spelling of a name, shall be counted for the office, if it is written in the blank space provided and voted as specified below:

(a) For voting systems in which write-in spaces appear directly below the list of candidates for that office and provide a voting space, no write-in vote shall be counted unless the voting space next to the write-in space is marked or slotted as directed in the voting instructions, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(b) For voting systems in which write-in spaces appear separately from the list of
 candidates for that office and do not provide a voting space, the name of the write-in candidate, if otherwise qualified, shall be counted if it is written in the manner described in the voting instructions.

(c) The use of pressure-sensitive stickers, glued stamps, or any other device not provided for in the voting procedures for the voting systems approved by the Secretary of State to indicate the name of the write-in candidate are not valid, and a name indicated by these methods shall not be counted.

(d) Neither a vote cast for a candidate whose name appears on the ballot nor a vote cast for a write-in candidate shall be counted if the voter has indicated, by a combination of marking and writing, a choice of more names than there are candidates to be nominated or elected to the office.

(e) All valid write-in votes
 shall be tabulated and certified to the elections official on forms provided for this purpose, and the write-in votes shall be added to the results of the count of the ballots at the counting place and be included in the official returns for the precinct.

(f) (1) In an election that uses a voting system described in subdivision (a), after tallying all eligible votes but prior to completion of the official canvass and the issuance of the certified statement of the results pursuant to this chapter, the elections official, upon the request of a qualified write-in candidate for an office being voted on in that election for an examination of undervotes that is received within five days of completion of the semiofficial canvass, may hand tally the remaining undervotes if any of the following is applicable:

(A) In the case of a primary election or a special
 election, the sum of the total number of votes cast for the write-in candidate and the total number of undervotes cast for the office but not examined pursuant to a hand tally is equal to or greater than the total number of votes cast for the candidate receiving the second highest number of votes for that office.

(B) In the case of a general election or a special runoff election, the sum of the total number of votes cast for the write-in candidate and the total number of undervotes cast for the office but not examined pursuant to a hand tally is equal to or greater than the total number of votes cast for the candidate receiving the highest number of votes for that office.

(C) In the case of an office for which a voter may vote for more than one candidate, the sum of the total number of votes cast for the write-in candidate and the total number of undervotes cast for the office but
 not examined pursuant to a hand tally is equal to or greater than the total number of votes cast for the candidate receiving the least number of votes that would be sufficient in order to be elected.

(2) The elections official may stop a hand tally conducted pursuant to this subdivision when the official determines that the applicable condition in any of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) is no longer applicable, or when all of the undervotes for the office have been examined.

(3) In conducting a hand tally pursuant to this subdivision, the elections official shall count a vote for the office if the intent of the voter can be determined, regardless of whether the voter has complied with the voting instructions. The elections official shall include the results of a hand tally conducted pursuant to this subdivision in the official canvass of the election.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “undervote” means a ballot on which a voter failed to cast any vote for a specific office or failed to cast the maximum number of votes permitted, as detected by an electronic, mechanical, or other vote-tabulating device.

(5) Notwithstanding Section 15624, a qualified write-in candidate is not responsible for the costs of a hand tally requested pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) This section does not prohibit a request for a recount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   (AB 503)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15342.5.

In the event of a manual recount conducted pursuant to Section 15610 or requested pursuant to Section 15620 or 15621, the process set forth in Section 15342 shall be liberally construed to ensure that each ballot is counted if the intent of the voter can be determined, regardless of whether the voter has complied with the voting instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   (AB 461)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Processing and Counting Provisional Ballots [15350. - 15350.]

15350.

Provisional ballots cast pursuant to Section 14310 shall be processed and counted in accordance with the provisions outlined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15100) and pursuant to the requirements of Sections 14310 and 14311.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 906, Sec. 6.   (AB 2530)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. One Percent Manual Tally [15360. - 15360.]

15360.

(a) During the official canvass of every election in which a voting system is used, the elections official shall conduct a public manual tally of the ballots tabulated by those devices, including vote by mail ballots, using either of the following methods:

(1) (A) A public manual tally of the ballots canvassed in the semifinal official canvass, including vote by mail ballots but not including provisional ballots, cast in 1 percent of the precincts chosen at random by the elections official. If 1 percent of the precincts is less than one whole precinct, the tally shall be conducted in one precinct chosen at random by the elections official.

(B) (i) In addition to the 1 percent manual tally, the elections official shall, for each race not included in the initial group of precincts, count one additional precinct. The manual tally shall apply only to the race not previously counted.

(ii) The elections official may, at the elections official’s discretion, select additional precincts for the manual tally, which may include vote by mail and provisional ballots.

(2) A two-part public manual tally, which includes both of the following:

(A) A public manual tally of the ballots canvassed in the semifinal official canvass, not including vote by mail or provisional ballots, cast in 1
 percent of the precincts chosen at random by the elections official and conducted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) (i) A public manual tally of not less than 1 percent of the vote by mail ballots canvassed in the semifinal official canvass. Batches of vote by mail ballots shall be chosen at random by the elections official.

(ii) For purposes of this section, a “batch” means a set of ballots tabulated by the voting system devices, for which the voting system can produce a report of the votes cast.

(iii) (I) In addition to the 1 percent manual tally of the vote by mail ballots, the elections official shall, for each race not included in the initial 1 percent manual tally of vote by mail
 ballots, count one additional batch of vote by mail ballots. The manual tally shall apply only to the race not previously counted.

(II) The elections official may, at the elections official’s discretion, select additional batches for the manual tally, which may include vote by mail and provisional ballots.

(b) The elections official shall use either a random number generator or other method specified in regulations that shall be adopted by the Secretary of State to randomly choose the initial precincts, batches of vote by mail ballots, or direct recording electronic voting machines subject to the public manual tally.

(c) The elections official shall not randomly choose the initial precincts or select an additional
 precinct for the manual tally until after the close of the polls on election day.

(d) The manual tally shall be a public process, with the official conducting the election providing at least a five-day public notice of the time and place of the manual tally and of the time and place of the selection of the precincts, batches, or direct recording electronic voting machines subject to the public manual tally before conducting the selection and tally.

(e) The elections official shall include a report on the results of the 1 percent manual tally in the certification of the official canvass of the vote. This report shall identify any discrepancies between the machine count and the manual tally and a description of how each of these discrepancies was resolved. In resolving a
 discrepancy involving a vote recorded by electronic or electromechanical vote tabulating devices, the voter verified paper audit trail shall govern if there is a discrepancy between it and the electronic record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 51.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Ballot Security and Reporting of Results [15370. - 15377.]

15370.

After ballots are counted and sealed, the elections official may not open any ballots nor permit any ballots to be opened except as permitted in Sections 15303 and 15304, or in the event of a recount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15371.

(a) Upon completion of the count, the elections official shall add to the results as so determined, the results of the write-in votes and any paper ballots used as certified by the precinct board, and thereupon shall declare the vote, and forthwith post one copy at the counting place for public inspection.

(b) The duties imposed on elections officials pursuant to subdivision (a) are ministerial and nondiscretionary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 2.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15372.

(a) The elections official shall prepare a certified statement of the results of the election and submit it to the governing body within 30 days of the election or, in the case of school district, community college district, county board of education, or special district elections conducted on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years, no later than the last Monday before the last Friday of that month.

(b) The elections official shall post the certified statement of the results of the election on the elections official’s internet website in a downloadable spreadsheet format that may include, but is not limited to, a comma-separated values file or a tab-separated values file and that is compatible with a spreadsheet software
 application that is widely used at the time of the posting. The certified statement of the election results shall be posted and maintained on the elections official’s internet website for at least 10 years following the election. This subdivision shall apply only to an elections official who uses a computer system that has the capability of producing the election results in a downloadable spreadsheet format without requiring modification of the computer system.

(c) The duties imposed on elections officials pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) are ministerial and nondiscretionary.

(d) If the elections official fails to prepare a certified statement of the results of the election as specified in subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall call the violation to the attention of the district attorney of the county or to the Attorney General and may assist the
 county elections official in discharging the officer’s duties, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 3.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15373.

When ballots are counted under this article, the result of the vote shall be shown by precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15374.

(a) The statement of the result shall show all of the following:

(1) The total number of ballots cast.

(2) The number of votes cast at each precinct for each candidate and for and against each measure.

(3) The total number of votes cast for each candidate and for and against each measure.

(b) The statement of the result shall also show the number of votes cast in each city, Assembly district, congressional district, senatorial district, State Board of Equalization district, and supervisorial district located in whole or in part in the county, for each candidate for the offices of presidential elector and all statewide offices, depending on the offices to be filled, and on each statewide ballot proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1073, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15375.

(a) The elections official shall send to the Secretary of State within 31 days of the election in an electronic format in the manner requested one complete copy of all results as to each of the following:

(1) All candidates voted for statewide office.

(2) All candidates voted for the following offices:

(A) Member of the State Assembly.

(B) Member of the State Senate.

(C) Member of the United States House of Representatives.

(D) Member of the State
 Board of Equalization.

(E) Justice of the Court of Appeal.

(F) Judge of the superior court.

(3) All persons voted for at the presidential primary. The results for all persons voted for at the presidential primary for delegates to national conventions shall be canvassed and shall be sent within 28 days after the election.

(4) The vote given for persons for electors of President and Vice President of the United States. The results for presidential electors shall be endorsed “Presidential Election Returns” and shall be canvassed and sent within 28 days after the election.

(5) All statewide measures.

(6) The total number of
 ballots cast.

(b) The duties imposed on elections officials pursuant to subdivision (a) are ministerial and nondiscretionary.
